Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 8
Apportionment — Membership in General Assembly

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 23 rewrote this article. Before its amendment, the article read:

“Section 1.

The House of Representatives shall consist of not less than seventy-three, nor more than one hundred members.

Each County now organized shall always be entitled to one Representative; the remainder to be apportioned among the several Counties according to the number of adult male inhabitants, taking two thousand as the ratio, until the number of Representatives amounts to one hundred, when they shall not be further increased, but the ratio of representation shall, from time to time, be increased as hereinafter provided; so that the Representatives shall never exceed that number. And until the enumeration of the inhabitants is taken by the United States government, A. D. 1880, the Representatives shall be apportioned among the several counties, as follows:

“The county of Arkansas shall elect one Representative. The county of Ashley shall elect one Representative. The county of Benton shall elect two Representatives. The county of Boone shall elect one Representative. The county of Bradley shall elect one Representative. The county of Baxter shall elect one Representative. The county of Calhoun shall elect one Representative. The county of Carroll shall elect one Representative. The county of Chicot shall elect one Representative. The county of Columbia shall elect two Representatives. The county of Clark shall elect two Representatives. The county of Conway shall elect one Representative. The county of Craighead shall elect one Representative. The county of Crawford shall elect one Representative. The county of Cross shall elect one Representative. The county of Crittenden shall elect one Representative. The county of Clayton shall elect one Representative. The county of Dallas shall elect one Representative. The county of Desha shall elect one Representative. The county of Drew shall elect one Representative. The county of Dorsey shall elect one Representative. The county of Franklin shall elect one Representative. The county of Fulton shall elect one Representative. The county of Faulkner shall elect one Representative. The county of Grant shall elect one Representative. The county of Greene shall elect one Representative. The county of Garland shall elect one Representative. The county of Hempstead shall elect two Representatives. The county of Hot Spring shall elect three Representatives. The county of Howard shall elect one Representative. The county of Independence shall elect two Representatives. The county of Izard shall elect one Representative. The county of Jackson shall elect one Representative. The county of Jefferson shall elect three Representatives. The county of Johnson shall elect one Representative. The county of Lafayette shall elect one Representative. The county of Lawrence shall elect one Representative. The county of Little River shall elect one Representative. The county of Lonoke shall elect two Representatives. The county of Lincoln shall elect one Representative. The county of Lee shall elect two Representatives. The county of Madison shall elect one Representative. The county of Marion shall elect one Representative. The county of Monroe shall elect one Representative. The county of Montgomery shall elect one Representative. The county of Mississippi shall elect one Representative. The county of Nevada shall elect one Representative. The county of Newton shall elect one Representative. The county of Ouachita shall elect two Representatives. The county of Perry shall elect one Representative. The county of Phillips shall elect three Representatives. The county of Pike shall elect one Representative. The county of Polk shall elect one Representative. The county of Pope shall elect one Representative. The county of Poinsett shall elect one Representative. The county of Pulaski shall elect four Representatives. The county of Prairie shall elect one Representative. The county of Randolph shall elect one Representative. The county of Saline shall elect one Representative. The county of Sarber shall elect one Representative. The county of Scott shall elect one Representative. The county of Searcy shall elect one Representative. The county of Sebastian shall elect two Representatives. The county of Sevier shall elect one Representative. The county of Sharp shall elect one Representative. The county of St. Francis shall elect one Representative. The county of Stone shall elect one Representative. The county of Union shall elect two Representatives. The county of Van Buren shall elect one Representative. The county of Washington shall elect three Representatives. The county of White shall elect two Representatives. The county of Woodruff shall elect one Representative. The county of Yell shall elect one Representative.

“Sec. 2.

The Legislature shall, from time to time, divide the State into convenient Senatorial districts, in such manner that the Senate shall be based upon the adult male inhabitants of the State; each Senator representating an equal number as nearly as practicable, and until the enumeration of the inhabitants is taken by the United States government A. D. 1880, the districts shall be arranged as follows:

“The counties of Greene, Craighead and Clayton shall compose the First district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Randolph, Lawrence and Sharp shall compose the Second district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Carroll, Boone and Newton shall compose the Third district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Johnson and Pope shall compose the Fourth district, and elect one Senator.

“The county of Washington shall compose the Fifth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Independence and Stone shall compose the Sixth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Woodruff, St. Francis, Cross and Crittenden shall compose the Seventh district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Yell and Sarber shall compose the Eighth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Saline, Hot Spring and Grant shall compose the Ninth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Pulaski and Perry shall compose the Tenth district, and elect two Senators.

“The county of Jefferson shall compose the Eleventh district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Lonoke and Prairie shall compose the Twelfth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Arkansas and Monroe shall compose the Thirteenth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Phillips and Lee shall compose the Fourteenth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Desha and Chicot shall compose the Fifteenth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Lincoln, Dorsey and Dallas shall compose the Sixteenth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Drew and Ashley shall compose the Seventeenth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Bradley and Union shall compose the Eighteenth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Calhoun and Ouachita shall compose the Nineteenth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Hempstead and Nevada shall compose the Twentieth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Columbia and Lafayette shall compose the Twenty-first district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Little River, Sevier, Howard, and Polk shall compose the Twenty-second district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Fulton, Izard, Marion and Baxter shall compose the Twenty-third district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Benton and Madison shall compose the Twenty-fourth district and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Crawford and Franklin shall compose the Twenty-fifth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Van Buren, Conway and Searcy shall compose the Twenty-sixth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of White and Faulkner shall compose the Twenty-seventh district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Sebastian and Scott shall compose the Twenty-eighth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Poinsett, Jackson and Mississippi shall compose the Twenty-ninth district, and elect one Senator.

“The counties of Clark, Pike and Montgomery shall compose the Thirtieth district, and elect one Senator.

“And the Senate shall never consist of less than thirty, nor more than thirty-five members.

“Sec. 3.

Senatorial districts shall at all times consist of contiguous territory, and no county shall be divided in the formation of a senatorial district.

“Sec. 4.

The division of the State into Senatorial districts, and the apportionment of Representatives to the several counties, shall be made by the General Assembly at the first regular session after each enumeration of the inhabitants of the State by the Federal or the State government, shall have been ascertained, and at no other time.”

Ark. Const. Amend. 45 amended the article as amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 23. See Publisher's Notes following §§ 1-6 for details of amendments to each section.

§ 1. Board of apportionment created — Powers and duties.

A Board to be known as “The Board of Apportionment,” consisting of the Governor (who shall be Chairman), the Secretary of State and the Attorney General is hereby created and it shall be its imperative duty to make apportionment of representatives in accordance with the provisions hereof; the action of a majority in each instance shall be deemed the action of said board. [As amended by Const. Amend. 23; Const. Amend. 45.]

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment by Ark. Const. Amend. 45, this section read: “A board to be known as ‘The Board of Apportionment,’ consisting of the Governor (who shall be Chairman), the Secretary of State and the Attorney General is hereby created and it shall be its imperative duty to make apportionment of representatives and senators in accordance with the provisions hereof; the action of a majority in each instance shall be deemed the action of said Board. [As amended by Const. Amend. 23.]”

§ 2. One hundred members in House of Representatives — Apportionment.

The House of Representatives shall consist of one hundred members and each county existing at the time of any apportionment shall have at least one representative; the remaining members shall be equally distributed (as nearly as practicable) among the more populous counties of the State, in accordance with a ratio to be determined by the population of said counties as shown by the Federal census next preceding any apportionment hereunder. [As amended by Const. Amend. 23; Const. Amend. 45.]

Publisher's Notes.

The provision of this section requiring a representative from each county was held unconstitutional, under the U.S. Constitution, in Yancey v. Faubus, 238 F. Supp. 290 (E.D. Ark. 1965), and Wells v. White, 274 Ark. 197, 623 S.W.2d 187 (1981), cert. denied, 456 U.S. 906, 102 S. Ct. 1753, 72 L. Ed. 2d 163 (1982).

Ark. Const. Amend. 45 made no change in the language of this section.

§ 3. Senatorial districts — Thirty-five members of Senate.

The Senate shall consist of thirty-five members. Senatorial districts shall at all times consist of contiguous territory, and no county shall be divided in the formation of such districts. “The Board of Apportionment” hereby created shall, from time to time, divide the state into convenient senatorial districts in such manner as that the Senate shall be based upon the inhabitants of the state, each senator representing, as nearly as practicable, an equal number thereof; each district shall have at least one senator. [As amended by Const. Amend. 23.]

Publisher's Notes.

The provision of this section prohibiting the division of counties was held unconstitutional, under the U.S. Constitution, in Wells v. White, 274 Ark. 197, 623 S.W.2d 187 (1981), cert. denied, 456 U.S. 906, 102 S. Ct. 1753, 72 L. Ed. 2d 163 (1982).

An amendment to this section by Ark. Const. Amend. 45 was declared unconstitutional in Yancey v. Faubus, 238 F. Supp. 290 (E.D. Ark. 1965). As so amended, the section would have read:

“The Senate shall consist of thirty-five members. Senatorial districts as now constituted and existing as heretofore directed by the Supreme Court of Arkansas in the case of Pickens v. Board of Apportionment, 220 Ark. 145, 246 S.W.2d 556, shall remain the same and the number of Senators from the districts shall not be changed.”

§ 4. Duties of Board of Apportionment.

On or before February 1 immediately following each Federal census, said board shall reapportion the State for Representatives, and in each instance said board shall file its report with the Secretary of State, setting forth (a) the basis of population adopted for representatives; (b) the number of representatives assigned to each county; whereupon, after 30 days from such filing date, the apportionment thus made shall become effective unless proceedings for revision be instituted in the Supreme Court within said period. [As amended by Const. Amend. 23; Const. Amend. 45.]

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment by Ark. Const. Amend. 45, this section read: “The Board shall make the first apportionment within ninety days from January 1, 1937; thereafter, on or before February 1 immediately following each Federal census, said Board shall apportion the State for both Representatives and Senators, and in each instance said Board shall file its report with the Secretary of State, setting forth (a) the basis of population adopted for representatives; (b) the basis for senators; (c) the number of representatives assigned to each county; (d) the counties comprising each senatorial district and the number of senators assigned to each, whereupon, after thirty days from filing date, the apportionment thus made shall become effective unless proceedings for revision shall be instituted in the Supreme Court within said period. [As amended by Const. Amend. 23.]”

§ 5. Mandamus to compel Board of Apportionment to act.

Original jurisdiction (to be exercised on application of any citizens and taxpayers) is hereby vested in the Supreme Court of the State (a) to compel (by mandamus or otherwise) the board to perform its duties as here directed and (b) to revise any arbitrary action of or abuse of discretion by the board in making such apportionment; provided any such application for revision shall be filed with said Court within 30 days after the filing of the report of apportionment by said board with the Secretary of State; if revised by the court, a certified copy of its judgment shall be by the clerk thereof forthwith transmitted to the Secretary of State, and thereupon be and become a substitute for the apportionment made by the board. [As added by Const. Amend. 23; as amended by Const. Amend. 45.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 45 made no change in the language of this section.

§ 6. Election of Senators and Representatives.

At the next general election for State and County officers ensuing after any such apportionment, Representatives shall be elected in accordance therewith, Senators shall be elected henceforth according to the apportionment now existing, and their respective terms of office shall begin on January 1 next following. Senators shall be elected for a term of four years at the expiration of their present terms of office. [As added by Const. Amend. 23; as amended by Const. Amend. 45.]

Publisher's Notes.

Although Ark. Const. Amend. 45 amended this section to read as it appears above, the court held in Williams v. Elrod, 244 Ark. 671, 426 S.W.2d 797 (1968) that the lot drawing provisions of Const. Amend. 23 were not in conflict with the provisions of Const. Amend. 45 and are still valid. As added by Const. Amend. 23, this section read: “At the next general election for State and County officers ensuing after such apportionment, senators and representatives shall be elected in accordance therewith and their respective terms of office shall begin on January 1 next following. At the first regular session succeeding any apportionment so made, the Senate shall be divided into two classes by lot, eighteen of whom shall serve a period of two years and the remaining seventeen for four years, after which all shall be elected for four years until the next reapportionment hereunder.”

Parties to Action.

A suit brought by a voter seeking a declaratory judgment as to whether the senate elected under this section should be divided into two classes by lot was fatally defective when only the five senators from the voter's senatorial district were named parties defendant, it being necessary to name all senators parties defendant. Block v. Allen, 241 Ark. 970, 411 S.W.2d 21 (1967).